Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2098.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 83MANUFACTURED HOMESSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Manufactured Home Community RightsC. Manufactured Home Ombudsman and Hearing BoardSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONS1234567891011121314151617181920 Sec.8301. Scope of chapter.8302. Definitions.§ 8301. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to manufactured homes.§ 8302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Office of Attorney General."Eviction." The removal of a lessee, occupant or manufactured home from a community in accordance with an order of possession by a court of the Commonwealth pursuant to:(1) the relevant provisions of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951; or( 2) a similar order of a court of common pleas. "First-time lessee." A resident who places or causes to be placed a manufactured home in a community."Manufactured home." As follows:(1) A transportable, single-family dwelling unit that:(i) contains plumbing, heating or cooling and electrical systems intended for permanent occupancy;(ii) is constructed as a single unit or as two or more units designed to be joined into one integral unit;(iii) is built on a permanent chassis; and(iv) is designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities.(2) T he term includes: 20250HB2098PN2697 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A manufactured home as defined in section 603(6) of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383, 42 U.S.C. § 5402(6)).(2) A mobile home as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Manufactured home community" or "community." As follows:(1) A site, lot, field or tract of land, privately or publicly owned or operated, upon which three or more manufactured homes, occupied for dwelling or sleeping purposes, are or are intended to be located, regardless of whether or not a charge is made for the accommodation.(2) The term includes a mobile home park."Manufactured home community lessee" or "lessee." A person who rents a manufactured home community space from a lessor pursuant to the terms of a lease."Manufactured home community lessor" or "lessor." The owner or operator of a community who rents a manufactured home space to a lessee pursuant to the terms of a lease and who is responsible for the performance of the terms of the lease."Manufactured home community operator" or "community operator." A person or entity that conducts the operations of a community on behalf and as the agent of a community owner."Manufactured home community owner" or "community owner." A person or entity that owns a community."Manufactured home occupant." An individual who resides in a manufactured home."Manufactured home resident" or "resident." As follows:(1) An owner of a manufactured home who leases or rents space in a community.20250HB2098PN2697 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term does not include a person who rents or leases a manufactured home."Manufactured home space." A plot of ground within a community designed for the accommodation of one manufactured home."Manufactured home space lease." A written contract between a lessee and a community owner containing reciprocal rights and duties, including the payment of rent for the use of ground for the placement of a manufactured home in a community."Manufactured home tenant" or "tenant." A person who leases a manufactured home from the owner of that manufactured home."Receipted first-class mail." As follows:(1) First-class mail for which a certificate of mailing has been obtained.(2) The term does not include certified or registered mail."Rent." Ground rent for a manufactured home space."Resident association." An organization open to all residents of a community, whether the organization is structured as a cooperative, a corporation or otherwise."Rules and regulations." Policies and guidelines established by a community owner that relate to community living."Service charges." Charges for electricity, gas service which is underground and piped directly to individual units within a community, trash removal, sewage , water, Internet, cable and all other utilities . SUBCHAPTER BMANUFACTURED HOME COMMUNITY RIGHTSSec.8311. Scope of subchapter.20250HB2098PN2697 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 8312. Evictions.8313. Community rules and regulations.8314. Written lease.8315. Underskirting and tie-down equipment.8316. Disclosure of fees.8317. Appliance installation fees.8318. Entrance and exit fees. 8319. Installation and removal fees.8320. Other fees.8321. Determination of abandonment.8322. Abandoned manufactured homes.8323. Immunity from liability.8324. Sale of manufactured homes.8325. Sale or lease of communities.8326. Closure of communities.8327. Notice requirements in event of closure of community. 8328. Waiver of rights.8329. Damages.8330. Restraining prohibited acts.8331. Enforcement.8332. Retaliatory evictions.8333. Remedies.§ 8311. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to manufactured home community rights.§ 8312. Evictions. (a) Permissible reasons.--A community owner may terminate or refuse to renew the lease of a lessee or may evict a lessee and manufactured home occupants only for one of the following reasons:20250HB2098PN2697 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Nonpayment of rent.(2) A second or subsequent violation of the rules of the community occurring within a six-month period.(3) A change in use of the community land or parts thereof.(4) Termination of the community.(b) Eviction procedures.--A lessee may only be evicted in accordance with the following procedure:(1) The lessee may not be evicted by any self-help measure.(2) Prior to the commencement of an eviction proceeding or the termination of or failure to renew the lease of the lessee , the community owner shall notify the lessee in writing of the particular breach or violation of the lease or community rules by certified or registered mail. The following apply to notices:(i) In the case of nonpayment of rent, the notice shall state that an eviction proceeding may be commenced if the lessee does not pay the overdue rent: (A) Within 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1.(B) Within 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1 or an additional nonpayment of rent occurring within six months of the giving of the notice may result in immediate eviction proceedings.(ii) In the case of a breach of the lease or violation of the community rules, other than nonpayment of rent, the notice shall describe the particular breach 20250HB2098PN2697 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or violation. The following procedures apply:(A) Unless the lessee has been notified as required by this section:(I) An eviction action may not be commenced.(II) A community owner may not terminate or refuse to renew the lease of the l essee . (B) Upon a second or subsequent violation or breach occurring within six months, a community owner may commence eviction proceedings at any time within 60 days of the last violation or breach.(c) Unequal treatment.--If there is proof that the rules that a lessee is accused of violating are not enforced with respect to the other lessees or nonresidents on the premises of the manufactured home:(1) The lessee may not be evicted. (2) The community owner may not terminate or refuse to renew the lease of the lessee.§ 8313. C ommunity rules and regulations. (a) Conditions.--A community owner may at any time establish fair and reasonable rules and regulations reasonably related to the health, safety and upkeep of the community, if the rules and regulations are:(1) not arbitrary or capricious;(2) included in any written lease;(3) delivered to existing lessees; and (4) posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the community.(b) Uniform application.--All rules or rental charges shall be uniformly applied to all lessees or prospective manufactured 20250HB2098PN2697 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 home occupants of the same or similar category. (c) Copy of rules and regulations.--(1) Each lessee shall be provided with a written copy of the rules and regulations of the community prior to the community owner's or community operator's acceptance of any initial deposit, fee or rent.(2) A copy of this subchapter shall be posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the community.(3) A copy of the following notice shall be reproduced in capital typewritten letters or in 10-point boldface print and be given to each resident upon entering into the lease.IMPORTANT NOTICE REQUIRED BY LAWThe rules set forth below govern the terms of your lease or occupancy agreement with this manufactured home community. The law requires all of these rules to be fair and reasonable.A s a lessee, you may continue to stay in this community as long as you pay your rent and other reasonable fees, service charges and assessments hereinafter set forth and abide by the rules of the community. Entrance and exit fees may not be charged. Installation and removal fees may not be charged in excess of the actual cost to the manufactured home community owner or operator for providing such service for the installation or removal of a manufactured home in a manufactured home space.A s a lessee, you may be evicted for any of the following reasons:(1) Nonpayment of rent.20250HB2098PN2697 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ( 2) A second or subsequent violation of the rules of the manufactured home community occurring within a six-month period.(3) If there is a change in use of the community land or parts thereof.(4) Termination of manufactured home community.A s a lessee, you shall only be evicted in accordance with the following procedure:(1) A lessee shall not be evicted by any self- help measure.( 2) Prior to the commencement of any eviction proceeding, the manufactured home community owner shall notify the lessee in writing of the particular breach or violation of the lease or community rules by certified or registered mail.(i) In the case of nonpayment of rent, the notice shall state that an eviction proceeding may be commenced if the manufactured home lessee does not pay the overdue rent within 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1, and 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1 or an additional nonpayment of rent occurring within six months of the giving of the notice may result in immediate eviction proceedings.(ii) In the case of a breach of the lease or violation of the community rules, other than nonpayment of rent, the notice shall describe the particular breach or violation. No eviction action shall be commenced unless the lessee has 20250HB2098PN2697 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been notified as required by this section, and upon a second or subsequent violation or breach occurring within six months, the manufactured home community owner may commence eviction proceedings at any time within 60 days of the last violation or breach.As a lessee, you shall not be evicted when there is proof that the rules you as the lessee are accused of violating are not enforced with respect to the other manufactured home residents or nonresidents on the community premises.In addition, no eviction proceeding for nonpayment of rent may be commenced against you as the lessee until you have received notice by certified or registered mail of the nonpayment and have been given to pay the overdue rent 20 days from the date of service if the notice is given on or after April 1 and before September 1, and 30 days if given on or after September 1 and before April 1. However, only one notice of overdue rent is required to be sent to you as the lessee during any six-month period. If a second or additional violation occurs within six months from the date of the first notice then eviction proceedings may be immediately started against you.You are entitled to purchase goods or services from a seller of your choice and the community owner shall not restrict your right to do so.If you desire to sell your manufactured home, the manufactured home community owner may not prevent the sale and may not claim any fee in connection therewith, unless there exists a separate written fee agreement. 20250HB2098PN2697 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 However, the manufactured home community owner may reserve the right to approve the purchaser as a resident in the manufactured home community.Enforcement of the manufactured home community rights provisions under 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subch. B is by the Attorney General of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or the District Attorney of the county in which the manufactured home community is located. As a lessee, you may also bring a private cause of action. If your rights are violated you may contact the State Bureau of Consumer Protection or your local District Attorney.§ 8314. Written lease. (a) Conditions.--Every lease for a manufactured home space shall be:(1) In writing.(2) For a duration term of one month , unless a longer period is mutually agreed upon by both the lessee and community owner.(3) Renewable . (b) Ground rents.--Rents for a mobile home site, commonly known as ground rents, shall not change more than once in a 12-month period.(c) Renewal.--For each lease period over 60 days prior to the expiration of the term of a community lease, the community owner shall offer the lessee a renewal lease for the same term and with the same provisions as the original agreement, unless the community owner notifies the lessee in writing of any changes, at least 60 days prior to the expiration of the lease.§ 8315. Underskirting and tie-down equipment. (a) Designation.--Subject to subsection (b), a community 20250HB2098PN2697 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owner or community operator may designate the type of material or manner of installation for underskirting, awnings, porches, fences or other additions and alterations to the exterior of the manufactured home and tie-down equipment compliant with all applicable requirements of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1282, No.158), known as the Manufactured Housing Improvement Act, and the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, in order to ensure the safety and good appearance of the community.(b) Prohibition.--A resident may not be required to purchase the equipment described under subsection (a) from a supplier designated by the community owner or community operator.§ 8316. Disclosure of fees. (a) Disclosure to lessees.--(1) All rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the community owner and utility charges for water, sewer, trash, Internet, cable, electricity and fuel charges payable to the community owner and notice of any other utility charges for which the lessee may be responsible shall be fully disclosed in writing to a prospective lessee prior to the community owner's or community operator's acceptance of any initial deposit, fee or rent and prior to execution of the manufactured home space lease . (2) For current residents, the community owner or community operator shall fully disclose all rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the community owner and utility charges for water, sewer, trash, cable, electricity and fuel charges payable to others in writing prior to the execution of a mandatory lease of at least one month in duration. 20250HB2098PN2697 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Receipt.--A community owner may require that a prospective lessee or current lessee sign a receipt indicating receipt of a copy of the required disclosure and the community rules and regulations so long as these documents are clearly identified in the receipt itself. The receipt shall indicate nothing more than that the documents identified in the receipt have been received by the lessee . (c) Failure to disclose.-- (1) Failure to disclose rent, fees, service charges and assessments in accordance with this section shall render them void and unenforceable in the courts of this Commonwealth.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), increases in rent, fees, service charges and assessments payable to the community owner shall be unenforceable until 30 days after notice thereof has been posted in the public portion of the community office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place in the community and mailed to the lessee . (3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), rent may not be increased during the term of the lease.(d) Written disclosure.--The written disclosure under this section shall contain a cover sheet with the following statement in 12-point, sans-serif type, except the term "five days" in the final paragraph of the notice shall appear in 16-point, sans-serif, bold type:This document contains important information regarding your legal rights and your financial obligations in leasing or renewing or signing a new lease for a manufactured home space. Make sure that you read the entire document and seek legal advice if you have any questions regarding the information stated in this document.20250HB2098PN2697 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Th e statements contained in this disclosure are only summary in nature. A prospective lessee should refer to all references, including all lease or rental agreement documents as well as any rules and regulations that have been established for the manufactured home community. Oral representations should not be relied on as correctly stating the representations of the manufactured home community owner or operator. Instead, you should refer to the lease or rental agreement and required disclosure documents for correct representations. You should also refer to 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subch. B to become familiar with your obligations and rights as a manufactured home resident.You have five calendar days from the date you received this documentation to cancel your agreement in writing to the manufactured home community owner or operator.(e) Specific disclosures.--All new leases, lease extensions and lease renewals that are for more than a 60-day period shall contain the following full disclosures:(1) The manner in which utility and other services, including sewage and waste disposal, cable television, water supply and storm drainage, will be provided, and the entity providing them. The services and the lot rental amount or user fees charged by the community owner for the services provided by the community owner shall also be disclosed.(2) An explanation of the manner in which the manufactured home space rental amount will be increased, including notification to the lessee at least 60 days in advance of the increase.(3) Disclosure of any factors that may affect the lot rental amount, including:20250HB2098PN2697 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Water rates.(ii) Sewer rates.(iii) Waste disposal rates.(iv) Maintenance costs, including costs of deferred maintenance.(v) Management costs.(vi) Property taxes.(vii) Major repairs or improvements.(viii) Any other fees, costs, assessments or service charges that the lessee is required to pay or that the community owner or community operator intends to charge during the terms of the lease or rental agreement.(4) Disclosure of the manner in which the pass-through charges will be assessed.( 5) A report of the utility fees charged for the manufactured home space paid to the community owner by a prior lessee during the previous 12 months . (6) Disclosure of all service charges currently charged for services offered that the lessee may elect to incur and the manner in which the fees will be increased.(7) Any community rules and regulations that have been established and an explanation of the manner in which the rules and regulations will be set, changed or promulgated.(8) The rent history of the manufactured home space for the three full calendar years immediately preceding the prospective initial rental agreement date. The following apply:(i) The rent history shall be for basic manufactured home space rental only and shall not apply to other fees, including late charges and guest fees.20250HB2098PN2697 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The calculation of rent history shall be posted in the public portion of the community's rental office or other conspicuous and readily accessible place and in the same place as any rules and regulations that have been established for the community are posted.(9) Citations or other documents from Federal, State or local governmental agencies that require the community owner to take corrective action, including citations from the Department of Environmental Protection regarding water and sewage. The information under this paragraph shall also be posted within the community in the same place as community rules and regulations are displayed until the corrective action has been completed.§ 8317. Appliance installation fees. A community owner or community operator may not:(1) Restrict the making of interior improvements in a manufactured home if the improvements are in compliance with applicable building codes and other provisions of law.(2) Restrict the installation, service or maintenance of an electric or gas appliance in a manufactured home or charge a fee for the installation unless the fee reflects the actual cost to the community owner or community operator of the installation or its use.§ 8318. Entrance and exit fees. Entrance and exit fees may not be charged.§ 8319. Installation and removal fees.(a) Amount.--Any fee charged by a community owner for the installation or removal of a manufactured home in a manufactured home space shall not exceed the actual cost to the community owner or community operator for providing the service.20250HB2098PN2697 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Refunds.--(1) Fees described in subsection (a) shall be refundable to the lessee at the time of removal if the community owner or community operator acts to recover possession of the space for reasons other than nonpayment of rent or breach of a condition of the lease within one year of the initial installation of the manufactured home.(2) Failure to refund fees in accordance with this section shall entitle the lessee to recover treble the amount of the fees plus court costs and reasonable attorney fees.(c) Effect of limitations.--Limitations on the type of installation fee described in this section shall not bar the community owner or community operator from requiring a reasonable security deposit in accordance with the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951.§ 8320. Other fees. (a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), in accordance with a lessee's right to invite to the lessee's manufactured home social and business visitors as the lessee wishes, a fee may not be charged for overnight visitors or guests occupying the lessee's manufactured home.(b) Exception.--If overnight visitors or guests of a lessee frequently remain overnight for residential purposes so as to increase the number of individuals normally living in the lessee's manufactured home, the community owner or community operator may revise the rent due to conform to the rent paid by other lessees with a similar number of members in their household.§ 8321. D etermination of abandonment. 20250HB2098PN2697 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Judicial process or voluntary abandonment.--A lessee or resident shall be deemed to have abandoned a manufactured home and all personal property in the manufactured home only after either:(1) Judicial process, which shall include all of the following:(i) T he entry of a judgment for possession in favor of the community owner or community operator in accordance with applicable law.(ii) The execution of an order for possession, or equivalent process, on the judgment for possession.(iii) A determination by a magisterial district court or other court of competent jurisdiction that the manufactured home and personal property in the manufactured home have been abandoned.(2) V oluntary abandonment, as evidenced by a written statement from the lessee or resident stating that the lessee or resident has physically or permanently vacated the manufactured home, does not intend to return to the manufactured home and has given up all further rights or ownership interest.(b) Preponderance of evidence and factors.--The determination of abandonment of a manufactured home shall be based on a preponderance of the evidence of the lessee's absence from the manufactured home for at least 30 days and nonpayment of rent for at least 30 days from the date that the rent is due, together with one or more of the following:(1) Termination of electric or water service to the manufactured home and other utility or payment of services to the community owner.20250HB2098PN2697 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Cancellation of insurance for the manufactured home. (3) Removal of most or all personal property from the manufactured home.(4) Any other indicia of abandonment. (c) Court authority.--In accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 1515(a)(7) (relating to jurisdiction and venue), a magisterial district court shall have jurisdiction to determine if a manufactured home has been abandoned and shall make a determination as to whether a manufactured home has been abandoned if the issue is presented.(d) Effect of abandonment determination.--A determination by the court that a manufactured home has been abandoned shall give the community owner the same rights as an entity that has been granted a judgment for possession.§ 8322. Abandoned manufactured homes. (a) Actions in case of abandonment.--If a resident abandons a manufactured home, the community owner or other authorized person may:(1) (i) Enter the manufactured home and secure any appliances, furnishings, materials, supplies or other personal property in the manufactured home.(ii) D isconnect the manufactured home from any utilities.( iii) Otherwise exercise ordinary care in relation to the manufactured home and personal property, including promptly disposing of perishable food and contacting an animal control agency or humane society to remove any abandoned pets.(2) Move the manufactured home, any personal property inside the manufactured home and personal property located 20250HB2098PN2697 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within the community that is believed to belong to the resident to a storage area within the community or to another location deemed necessary and proper without the requirement of obtaining a removal permit for the manufactured home from the local taxing authority, which would otherwise be required under 53 Pa.C.S. § 8821(d) (relating to assessment of mobile homes and manufactured homes). The following apply:(i) Prior to moving the manufactured home and personal property, the community owner shall notify th e former manufactured home resident by mail and by posting on the manufactured home and at any other known address or by any other means by which notice may be achieved. The notice must state that the manufactured home and personal property, if applicable, will be moved 60 days after the date of notice and must inform the former resident of the new location of the manufactured home and personal property.( ii) The manufactured home shall continue to be subject to t he lien for taxes assessed against it, but the real estate on which the manufactured home was and is located shall not be encumbered by or be subject to the lien.(3) Assess removal charges and storage charges against the former manufactured home residents.(4) Dispose of the personal property or manufactured home, or both, in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (d). The following apply:(i) If the personal property or manufactured home is sold, the proceeds from the sale shall be distributed in the following order:20250HB2098PN2697 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) To pay the costs of moving, storing and selling the personal property or manufactured home.(B) T o pay all back rent due and all other amounts due to the community owner.(C) To pay all outstanding taxes on the manufactured home.(D) To pay all outstanding liens on the manufactured home.(ii) Any amount still remaining from the sale after payment of the items in subparagraph (i) shall be paid to the resident. If the resident's whereabouts are unknown, any amount due and payable to the resident shall be paid to the Commonwealth as required by Article XIII.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(b) Liability.--Upon proper disposal of the personal property and the manufactured home, the purchaser or community owner, and any person acting for or on behalf of the purchaser or community owner, shall not be liable for any outstanding taxes or liens on the manufactured home.(c) Loss, damage or charges.--The community owner or other authorized person acting in good faith to comply with the requirements of this section shall not be responsible for any loss or damage to a manufactured home, personal property inside the manufactured home or within the community or for any fees, assessments or other charges of any kind relating to the abandoned manufactured home unless the community owner failed to provide the notice required under this section or failed to exercise due care of the manufactured home or personal property.(d) Notice generally.--20250HB2098PN2697 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The community owner or other authorized person may dispose of the manufactured home and personal property after first giving written notice to the resident and any lienholder. The notice shall be:(i) Sent by certified mail, return-receipt requested, or by receipted first class mail, to the resident's last known address, which may be the address of the premises, and at any alternate address or addresses if known to the community owner or other authorized person, including the address of emergency contacts if provided.(ii) Posted in a conspicuous location in the community.(2) The notice of removal required under subsection (a)(2)(i) and the notice of disposal required under paragraph (1) may be combined in one notice.(e) Contents of notice.--The notice required under this section shall state the following:(1) The manufactured home and contents are considered abandoned and, to avoid the sale or other disposal of the manufactured home, the manufactured home and contents must be claimed and removed from the premises in the community, the storage area or place of storage within 60 days after the date of mailing of the notice.( 2) If the manufactured home and contents are not claimed and removed within the time specified in the notice:(i) the owner or other authorized person may sell the manufactured home at public or private sale with or without additional notices; or(i i) if it is reasonably determined by the community 20250HB2098PN2697 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owner or other authorized person that the value of the property is so low that the cost of storage and conducting a sale would e xceed the amount that would be realized from the sale of the manufactured home, the manufactured home may be destroyed or discarded.(3) (i) Within the time provided in the notice, the resident may claim the manufactured home by notifying the community owner or other authorized person in writing that the manufactured home will be claimed and removed within the time provided in the notice or a later time as is mutually agreed to by the community owner or other authorized person and the resident.(ii) If the resident fails to claim and remove the manufactured home within the time specified in the notice or the later time, the manufactured home shall be conclusively deemed abandoned, and the community owner or other authorized person shall be entitled to proceed to sell or otherwise dispose of the manufactured home.(f) Notice to Department of Transportation.--When a community owner or other authorized person disposes of the manufactured home, notice of disposal shall be sent to the Department of Transportation, addressed to the Bureau of Motor Vehicles, Vehicle Registration Division or other office or bureau as is designated by the Department of Transportation.(g) Actions by Department of Transportation.--(1) When a manufactured home is sold under this section, the Department of Transportation shall, upon proof of sale and purchase, notwithstanding any provision of 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles), issue a certificate of title to the purchaser evidencing no encumbrances.20250HB2098PN2697 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the manufactured home is not sold but is destroyed or discarded because the value of the manufactured home was determined to be so low that the storage and sale would exceed the amount to be realized in the sale, the Department of Transportation shall, upon receiving notarized documentation that the manufactured home was de stroyed or discarded, make an appropriate notation on its recordkeeping system that the manufactured home has been destroyed or discarded and that no certificate of title should again be issued for the manufactured home.(3) The Department of Transportation may create and use a special form for the process under this subsection but may not impose any other requirements for compliance with this provision to be fulfilled.(h) Vacant space.--(1) When a manufactured home is moved to a storage area or another location or is disposed of as provided for by this section and the space on which that manufactured home previously was located is vacant, the community owner or other authorized person may lease that space to a new resident or otherwise locate another manufactured home on that space.(2) The municipality o r taxing district in which the community is located may not:(i) Prevent the occupancy of the space described in paragraph (1) by another manufactured home.(ii) Attach any conditions to the occupancy that are not applicable to a new resident locating in a space made vacant by circumstances other than abandonment.(i) Liability for taxes, fees, assessments and other 20250HB2098PN2697 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charges.--(1) If a manufactured home is moved to a storage area or another location or is disposed of as provided for in this section, the real estate on which the manufactured home was or is located, the community or the purchaser of the manufactured home shall not be liable for any taxes, fees, assessments or other charges imposed by the municipality or taxing district on the manufactured home.( 2) Liability for taxes assessed and imposed on a resident or liability to satisfy a lien for taxes shall continue to be the responsibility of the resident and shall not be a ssessed and imposed on the real estate on which the manufactured home was or is located, the community or the purchaser of the manufactured home, all of which is as provided for in the act of May 22, 1933 (P.L.853, No.155), known as The General County Assessment Law, or in 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88 (relating to consolidated county assessment).(3) A government entity may not refuse to issue or delay issuing any permits, licenses or other required authorities to the community, community owner, purchaser or any new tenant or resident attempting to locate or lease a manufactured home on the property where the abandoned home was located solely because of tax liability on the abandoned home.§ 8323. Immunity from liability. A community owner who complies with the procedures under this subchapter shall be immune from liability with regard to or as a consequence of the sale, disposal or destruction of an abandoned manufactured home and any contents in the manufactured home or otherwise in the community or associated with the home except as 20250HB2098PN2697 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 otherwise specifically specified in this subchapter.§ 8324. Sale of manufactured homes. (a) Requirements.--(1) A rule, regulation or condition of a lease purporting to prevent the sale of a manufactured home belonging to a lessee shall be void and unenforceable in the courts of this Commonwealth.(2) A community owner or community operator may reserve the right to approve the purchaser of the manufactured home as a lessee , but the approval may not be unreasonably withheld.(3) A claim for a fee or commission in connection with the sale of a manufactured home shall be void and unenforceable unless the claimant shall in fact have acted as a bona fide licensed manufactured home sales agent for the manufactured home owner pursuant to a separate written fee agreement.(b) Disclosure and notice.--Prior to a lessee or occupant in a community offering a manufactured home for sale, the lessee or occupant must obtain from the community operator the then-current disclosure document required by this subchapter and provide a copy to any prospective buyer along with an attached sheet of paper with the following information printed in 12-point boldfaced type:Be advised that this manufactured home offered for sale is subject to 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subch. B and a written lease required under that law. You are advised that the community in which this home is now placed requires an approved application for lessees and occupants and a fully executed lease prior to your right to reside in the 20250HB2098PN2697 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community.You shall have a minimum of five calendar days after receiving this disclosure required under 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subch. B to void the transaction with the operator, if any, and, if terminated, you shall be returned any deposits and rents paid to the operator of the community.(c) Grounds for cancellation.--Failure of the resident seller to obtain a dated acknowledgment from the prospective buyer of the manufactured home of receipt of the disclosure may be grounds for cancellation of the sale by the buyer.§ 8325. Sale or lease of communities. (a) Notice of sale or lease.--In the event of the sale or lease of a community, a community owner shall provide written notice to the residents and tenants of the community and to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency. The notice shall be:(1) Sent within 30 days after the agreement of sale is signed.(2) Posted in the same conspicuous and readily accessible place in the community where the community rules and regulations are posted, in accordance with section 8313 (relating to community rules and regulations).(b) Notice of name and contact information.--Within 30 days of transfer of title to the community, the new community owner shall notify the residents and tenants of the name of the new community owner and contact information for either the new community owner or new community operator. The notice shall be:(1) Mailed to each resident and tenant of the community.(2) Posted immediately in the same conspicuous and readily accessible place in the community where the community rules and regulations are posted, in accordance with section 20250HB2098PN2697 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 8313.§ 8326. Closure of communities. (a) Notice of closure.--In the event of the closure of a community, in whole or in part, the community owner shall:(1) W ithin 60 days of deciding to close the community, provide written notice, which shall:(i) Be given to:(A) The residents and tenants of the community.(B) The resident association, if one exists.(C) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(D) The municipality where the community is located.(ii) Include:(A) The estimated date that residents and tenants will be expected to vacate the community, which shall be no less than 180 days from the date of the notice.(B) The estimated date that the community will be closed.(2) Notify any prospective resident in writing, prior to leasing a manufactured home space, and any known prospective tenant, prior to leasing a manufactured home in a community , of the scheduled closing date.(b) Offer to purchase.--A community owner shall consider any offer to purchase the community made by a resident association representing at least 25% of the manufactured home spaces or by a nonprofit corporation, including a community development corporation, housing authority or redevelopment authority acting at the request of the residents of at least 25% of the spaces and shall negotiate in good faith with the entity submitting the 20250HB2098PN2697 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offer.(c) Relocation expenses.--A community owner shall pay relocation expenses to the owner of a manufactured home in a community that is closing in an amount equivalent to the cost of relocation, not to exceed the amount of $4,000 for a single section manufactured home and $6,000 for a multisection manufactured home. The amounts stated in this subsection shall be adjusted annually by the Department of Community and Economic Development to reflect any increase in the Consumer Price Index.(d) Replacement site.--A community owner shall pay a minimum of $2,500 or the appraised value, whichever is greater, of any manufactured home to the resident of the manufactured home upon the closure of the community if the resident is unable or unwilling to find a reasonably suitable replacement site. The following apply:(1) The appraised value must be provided by a certified residential real estate appraiser with substantial experience in appraising manufactured homes who is mutually agreed to by the community owner and resident.(2) If the parties cannot agree on an appraiser, each shall select an appraiser, and the two appraisers shall select the appraiser to perform the appraisal.(3) The community owner and resident shall each pay half of the cost for the appraisal.(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the community owner and resident may mutually agree upon a price for the sale of the manufactured home.(e) Condemnation, eminent domain or other governmental action.--If a community is closed because of a condemnation, action in eminent domain or other governmental action, the 20250HB2098PN2697 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufactured home residents shall not be entitled to payments specified in subsections (c) and (d), but shall be entitled to the rights and remedies available under laws relating to condemnation, eminent domain or other governmental action.(f) Right to terminate.--A tenant who rents a manufactured home in a community shall have the right to terminate the lease without penalty upon receiving notice of the planned closing of the community.(g) Removal and disposal and assignment of title.--(1) A resident shall not be required to remove the manufactured home from the land when a community closes and shall not be liable for the costs of removing or disposing of the manufactured home.(2) The community owner may require a resident who is leaving a manufactured home in the community to assign the title to the community owner. If the resident refuses to make the assignment, the community owner may proceed under section 8321 (relating to determination of abandonment).§ 8327. Notice requirements in event of closure of community. (a) Sending of notice.--The notice given to the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency under section 8326 (relating to closure of communities) shall be sent by certified mail and shall be addressed to the legal department of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(b) Notice of list.--(1) No later than December 24, 2012, the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website that it is 20250HB2098PN2697 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compiling a list of parties interested in receiving copies of any notice received by it under sections 8325 (relating to sale or lease of communities) and 8326 and inviting the parties to provide their contact information to receive notices of community sales or closures. Interested parties may indicate their region of this Commonwealth or that they operate Statewide.( 2) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall send copies of notices it receives under this section to parties on the list that are Statewide or within the region the parties identify. Notices shall be sent by regular mail or by electronic mail within 10 calendar days of the legal department's receipt of a notice.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to create any liability for the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency or otherwise to affect the transfer of any real property if there is a failure to provide notice in accordance with this subchapter.(c) Delivery of notice of closure.--A notice given in accordance with section 8326(a)(1) shall be:(1) Delivered to an adult resident of each manufactured home space within the community or mailed by first class mail to the resident or tenant of each space.(2) Posted in the same conspicuous and readily accessible place in the community where the community rules and regulations are posted, under section 8313 (relating to community rules and regulations).(d) Delivery of notice regarding scheduled closing date.--A notice given in accordance with section 8326(a)(2) shall be given personally to the prospective resident or known 20250HB2098PN2697 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prospective tenant.§ 8328. Waiver of rights. The rights and duties of community owners, community operators and l essees may not be waived by any provisions of a written or oral agreement. An agreement attempting to limit the rights shall be void and unenforceable in the courts of this Commonwealth.§ 8329. Damages.(a) Cause of action.--A community owner, community operator or lessee aggrieved by a violation of rights under this subchapter may institute a private cause of action in an appropriate court of initial jurisdiction within this Commonwealth:(1) to recover damages;(2) for treble damages in accordance with this subchapter; or(3) for restitution.(b) When rental agreement voidable.--If disclosure as required by 8316 (relating to disclosure of fees) was not provided to the community prospective first-time lessee prior to execution of the manufactured home space rental agreement or prior to initial occupancy of a manufactured home, the rental agreement is voidable by the lessee during the first year of occupancy until five calendar days after the receipt of the disclosure by the lessee.(c) Notice required to void rental agreement.--To void the rental agreement, the prospective first-time lessee shall deliver written notice to the community owner or community operator within five days after receipt of the disclosure and shall thereupon be entitled to a refund from the community owner 20250HB2098PN2697 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or community operator of any deposit, together with installation costs for the manufactured home, paid to the community owner or community operator.(d) Rent collection.--A community owner or community operator may not collect rent from a prospective first-time lessee until the community owner or community operator and the lessee have entered into the rental agreement.(e) Lease required.--When a community owner or community operator and a lessee execute a new, renewed or extended lease for a manufactured home space, which increases rent or payables to the lessor, the community owner or community operator may not collect increased rent or fee payable rent from the lessee until the community owner or community operator and the lessee have entered into the new, renewed or extended lease. The following apply:(1) After receiving 60 days' notice of the community owner's or community operator's intent to offer a new lease, the manufactured home occupant shall have 30 days to either accept the new, renewed or extended rental agreement or to notify the community owner or community operator of intent to vacate within 30 days.(2) Increased rent or fee lease charges shall not be effective against a lessee prior to the 61st day after receiving the notice from the community owner or community operator.(f) Lessee not entering rental agreement.-- A lessee who chooses not to enter into a new, renewed or extended rental agreement shall have 60 days from the date of notification of intent to vacate the community, enter into contract to sell or relocate the manufactured home. The following apply:20250HB2098PN2697 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) No increased rent fee or lease charge shall apply during this period.(2) So long as the community owner or community operator complied with disclosure as provided in section 8316, the lessee shall not be entitled to relocation costs. § 8330. Restraining prohibited acts. Whenever the Attorney General or a district attorney has reason to believe that a person is using or is about to use any method, act or practice declared by this subchapter to be prohibited, and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the Attorney General or district attorney may bring an action in the name of the Commonwealth against the person to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of the method, act or practice.§ 8331. Enforcement.The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this subchapter, but an individual shall not be prohibited or otherwise restricted from initiating a private cause of action pursuant to any right or remedy conferred by this subchapter.§ 8332. Retaliatory evictions.An action by a community owner or community operator to recover possession of real property from a lessee or to change the lease within six months of a lessee's assertion of rights under this subchapter or any other legal right shall raise a presumption that the action constitutes a retaliatory and unlawful eviction by the community owner or community operator and is in violation of this subchapter. The presumption may be rebutted by competent evidence presented in an appropriate court of initial jurisdiction within this Commonwealth.§ 8333. Remedies. 20250HB2098PN2697 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Enforcement.--A violation of this subchapter:(1) May be enforced as provided by sections 8329 (relating to damages), 8330 (relating to restraining prohibited acts), 8331 (relating to enforcement) and 8332 (relating to retaliatory evictions).(2) Shall also constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be a violation of and be subject to the enforcement provisions and private rights of action contained in that act.(b) Injunctive relief.--Residents shall have the right to seek injunctive relief to enforce compliance with this section and sections 8325 (relating to sale or lease of communities) and 8326 (relating to closure of communities).SUBCHAPTER CMANUFACTURED HOME OMBUDSMAN AND HEARING BOARDSec.8341. Scope of subchapter.8342. Definitions.8343. Manufactured Home Ombudsman.8344. Manufactured Home Hearing Board.8345. Disposition before ombudsman.8346. Petition for appeal to board.8347. Hearing before board.8348. Appeal to Commonwealth Court.8349. Notification of law.8350. Restricted account.8351. Construction of subchapter.§ 8341. Scope of subchapter.20250HB2098PN2697 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This subchapter relates to the Manufactured Home Ombudsman and the Manufactured Home Hearing Board.§ 8342. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Manufactured Home Hearing Board established under section 8344(a) (relating to Manufactured Home Hearing Board)." Comparable manufactured home community" or "comparable community." A community with similar facilities, services, amenities and management."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Office." The Office of Manufactured Home Ombudsman established under section 8343(a) (relating to Manufactured Home Ombudsman)."Ombudsman." The head of the office."Respondent." A person against whom a complaint, which is filed with the office, is directed."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Unreasonable." Not fair, proper, just, moderate or suitable under the circumstances or fit or appropriate to the end in view.§ 8343. Manufactured Home O mbudsman. (a) Establishment.--The Office of Manufactured Home Ombudsman is established within the department.(b) Appointment.--The ombudsman shall head the office and shall be a full-time employee of the department with fixed 20250HB2098PN2697 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compensation.(c) Powers and duties.--The office shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To investigate and resolve complaints and disputes involving manufactured homes, including disputes involving lessees or residents and community owners or community operators, including:(i) Community matters generally.(ii) The interpretation of provisions under Subchapter B (relating to manufactured home community rights).(iii) The approval of a prospective purchaser of an existing manufactured home owned by a resident.(iv) The reasonableness of rules and regulations promulgated by community owners in accordance with Subchapter B.(v) Environmental concerns, including the provision of safe drinking water and proper sewage disposal.(vi) The interpretation of provisions of lease agreements.(vii) The reasonableness of proposed rent increases.(viii) The reasonableness of pending eviction procedures.(2) To initiate a legal proceeding before a Federal, State or county court necessary to protect the rights of lessees or residents and to represent the lessees or residents before the court in the legal proceeding.(3) To initiate a proceeding before a Federal, State or local agency necessary to protect the rights of lessees or residents and to represent the lessees or residents in the 20250HB2098PN2697 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeding.(4) To educate the public regarding the purchase of a manufactured home and a manufactured home space lease, which shall include a notice and other information in accordance with the following:(i) The notice shall include the title "ALERT TO PROSPECTIVE PURCHASER OF MANUFACTURED HOME OR LESSEE IN MANUFACTURED HOME COMMUNITY," followed by a brief summary of the key facts of which anyone contemplating purchasing a manufactured home or leasing space in a community should be aware.(ii) The notice, including the title, shall be in 10-point boldface print.(iii) Within 90 days of the effective date of this subparagraph, the ombudsman shall provide a copy of the notice and brief summary, along with a copy of this subchapter and Subchapter A (relating to preliminary provisions) and the responsibilities of the ombudsman as specified in this subchapter, to:(A) Manufactured home dealers or others licensed in this Commonwealth under the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, to be provided to a prospective purchaser of a new manufactured home at least 48 hours before the purchaser signs an agreement of sale.(B) A person licensed under the Board of Vehicles Act, or any real estate salesperson or broker licensed under the act of February 19, 1980 (P.L.15, No.9), known as the Real Estate Licensing and Registration Act, to be provided to a prospective 20250HB2098PN2697 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchaser of a preowned manufactured home at least 48 hours before the purchaser signs an agreement of sale.(C) Community owners and community operators, to be provided to a prospective lessee at least 48 hours before the lessee signs a lease for space in a community operated in this Commonwealth.(iv) Failure to receive a copy of the notice and information described under subparagraph (iii) shall not relieve a person of fulfilling any required obligation under this subchapter.(v) The ombudsman shall post the notice and information under subparagraph (iii) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the office.(5) To educate the public concerning the powers and duties of the ombudsman and the services available.(6) To establish a toll-free telephone number for public use regarding inquiries on the services available from the ombudsman, including the procedures for filing a complaint and making an appeal to the board.§ 8344. Manufactured Home Hearing Board.(a) Establishment.--The Manufactured Home Hearing Board is established as an independent quasi-judicial agency.(b) Members.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee of the secretary.(2) One individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) One individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.20250HB2098PN2697 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(5) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(c) Chairperson.--The board shall designate one member of the board to serve as the chairperson.(d) Terms.--(1) A member of the board shall serve for a term of five years or until a successor is appointed and qualified within six months of the expiration of the original term.(2) A member of the board may be reappointed to successive terms.(e) Limitations.--A board member may not:(1) Be a manufactured home owner, manufactured home manufacturer or manufactured home dealer.(2) Own or manage a community.(3) Be an agent for a community, manufactured home manufacturer or manufactured home dealer.(4) Have a financial interest in the business of, or in any way be associated with, a manufactured home manufacturer, manufactured home dealer or owner of a community.(5) Be affiliated with manufactured homes or manufactured home groups or associations.(f) Compensation and reimbursement.--The members of the board shall not receive compensation for service as members of the board but shall be reimbursed for all necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the performance of duties as members of the board.(g) Meetings.-- (1) The board shall meet at least four times a year or 20250HB2098PN2697 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as often as is necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this subchapter.(2) The meetings of the board shall be rotated between Pittsburgh, Philadelphia, Scranton and Harrisburg as feasible to facilitate the attendance of those having appeals pending before the board.(h) Powers and duties.--The board shall conduct hearings to consider appeals of decisions by the ombudsman in accordance with this subchapter.§ 8345. D isposition before ombudsman. (a) Authorization.--The following may file a complaint with the office and request an investigation to resolve a dispute associated with a manufactured home or community:(1) A lessee.(2) A lessor.(3) A community owner.(4) A community operator.(5) A person who rents or leases a manufactured home that is located in a community for which a ground rental fee is paid.(b) Complaint form.--(1) The ombudsman shall develop a standardized complaint form to be used for the purpose described under subsection (a).(2) The complaint form must include:(i) The address, telephone number and any other contact information of the person filing the complaint.(ii) The actions or circumstances given rise to the complaint.(iii) The address, telephone number and any other 20250HB2098PN2697 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contact information of each respondent.(3) The complaint form and instructions on how to submit the complaint form shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the office.(4) A fee may not be charged to file a complaint with the office.(c) Notice to respondents.--Upo n receipt of a complaint form, the ombudsman shall send to each named respondent, by certified mail, a copy of the complaint, along with a notice that a response is required showing cause, if any, why the complaint should be dismissed. The ombudsman shall prescribe the form and manner of the response.(d) Review.--After reviewing the complaint and response, the ombudsman or the members of the staff of the office shall promptly investigate the complaint, including a complaint involving proposed rent increases, and attempt to mediate the dispute.(e) Decisions generally.--(1) The ombudsman shall render a decision on a complaint within 21 days of receipt of the complaint.(2) The decision of the ombudsman shall be final and binding on all parties, and the ombudsman may enforce an order through a court of competent jurisdiction, unless the order is overturned by the board on appeal in accordance with section 8347 (relating to hearing before board).(3) After the investigation of a complaint, the ombudsman:(i) May determine that there is no factual basis to support the complaint and shall so notify all parties.(ii) May determine that the complaint is 20250HB2098PN2697 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 substantiated and may make a recommendation to resolve the dispute, to which all parties may voluntarily agree. In the absence of the voluntary acceptance of the recommendations by all parties, the ombudsman shall issue an order specifying the appropriate actions to be taken by all parties to the dispute.(f) Automatic stay.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), once the office initiates an investigation regarding a complaint filed with the office, any pending proposed rent increase, rule or regulation or eviction proceeding shall be stayed pending a final decision by the ombudsman.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply in the case of a proposed annual rent increase that does not exceed the annual increase in the cost of living, as determined by the United States Department of Labor for the preceding calendar year, but a resident under the circumstance may file a complaint with the office regarding the reasonableness of the proposed increase.(g) Determination regarding proposed annual rent increase.--(1) When making a determination as to the reasonableness of a proposed annual rent increase for a community, the ombudsman shall consider the following:(i) Rents charged by comparable communities within the same competitive geographic area.(ii) Recent changes in the Consumer Price Index. (iii) The rate of inflation since the last annual rent increase.(iv) The historic trend of prior annual rent increases for the community.20250HB2098PN2697 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The historic trend of prior annual rent increases for comparable communities within the same competitive geographic area.(vi) Financial data relative to any change in ownership of the community.(vii) Current and prior financial statements of the community owner, including annual operating costs and taxes paid.(viii) Actual cost data relative to improvements made or to be made to the community when the cost of improvements is used as a justification for the proposed annual rent increase.(ix) Historical evidence of improvements made to the community previously when annual rents were increased.(x) Whether the proposed annual rent increase results in the rent exceeding market rent or the rent that would result from market forces when both parties have an equal bargaining position.(2) If, after an investigation, the ombudsman determines that the proposed annual rent increase is unreasonable:(i) T he proposed annual rent increase shall not go into effect.(ii) T he community owner shall: (A) pending a final decision of the ombudsman, refund to each resident affected the increased amount paid that was determined to be unreasonable; or(B) credit the resident with an equal amount of the rent due:(I) in the month following the decision of the ombudsman; or20250HB2098PN2697 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) if appealed, in the month following a decision by the board.(iii) The ombudsman may recommend, as part of an order, an annual rent increase that the ombudsman deems reasonable.(h) Determination regarding proposed rule or regulation.--If, after an investigation, the ombudsman determines that an existing or proposed rule or regulation promulgated by the community owner or community operator is unreasonable, the rule or regulation shall be rescinded.(i) Copies of decision.-- Copies of all decisions of the ombudsman shall be forwarded to the agency.§ 8346. Petition for appeal to board.(a) Authorization.--If aggrieved by the decision of the ombudsman, the person filing the complaint or a respondent may appeal the order of the ombudsman to the board and request a hearing before the board.(b) Petition.--(1) The ombudsman shall develop a standardized petition form to be used for the purpose described under subsection (a).(2) The petition and instructions on how to submit the petition to the office shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the office.(c) Filing fee.--(1) A filing fee of $100 shall accompany each petition.(2) If, on appeal, the board finds in favor of the person who filed the complaint, the respondent shall be responsible for the payment of the fee for filing the petition.20250HB2098PN2697 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Notice to board.--Upon receipt of a petition and filing fee under this section, the ombudsman shall forward a copy of the petition to the chairperson of the board.§ 8347. Hearing before board.(a) Scheduling and notice.-- Upon receiving a petition from the ombudsman in accordance with section 8346 (relating to petition for appeal to board), the chairperson of the board shall schedule a hearing on the appeal and shall:(1) Provide the parties with reasonable notice of the date, time and location of the hearing.(2) Provide notice of the hearing to the agency.(b) Hearing procedures.--The following apply to a hearing under this section:(1) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 (relating to practice and procedure).(2) A party to the hearing may:(i) Present witnesses, in person or by deposition, and may present evidence, on making a request to the board.(ii) Designate any person, records and papers requested to be subpoenaed.(iii) Request that a written transcript of the hearing be taken and made upon payment of the cost of the transcript.(3) Subpoenas may be enforced in Commonwealth Court, which, after a hearing, may judge a person in contempt or make another appropriate order.(4) For the purpose of the hearing, the board shall have the powers vested in the officers by section 502 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The 20250HB2098PN2697 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Administrative Code of 1929.(5) The board may cause the deposition of witnesses in or outside of this Commonwealth to be taken as prescribed by law for depositions in civil cases.(c) Inspection.--A party to a hearing under this section, or an authorized agent of the party if the authorization is filed in writing with the ombudsman , may inspect any file that pertains to the hearing.(d) Proposed rent increase.--In the case of a complaint involving a proposed rent increase, the board shall hear the case within 30 days of receipt of the petition for a hearing.(e) Decision.--(1) No later than seven calendar days after the conclusion of a hearing under this section, the board shall render a decision on the appeal based on evidence given at the hearing.(2) The decision of the board shall be final and binding on all parties unless appealed to Commonwealth Court in accordance with section 8348 (relating to appeal to Commonwealth Court).(3) Upon rendering a decision on an appeal, the board shall forward a copy of the decision to the parties and to the agency.§ 8348. Appeal to Commonwealth Court.No later than 20 days after the service of a copy of the decision of the board, a party aggrieved by the decision may appeal the decision to Commonwealth Court.§ 8349. N otification of law. With respect to the information specified under section 8343(c)(4)(iii)(C) (relating to Manufactured Home Ombudsman), 20250HB2098PN2697 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 e ach community owner or community operator shall: (1) Within 30 days of receiving the information from the ombudsman, provide a copy of the information to each resident of the community.(2) Provide the information to each prospective lessee at least 48 hours before the lessee signs a lease for space in the community.(3) Maintain a copy of the information at a convenient location within the community for review by residents of the community.§ 8350. R estricted account. (a) Establishment.--The Manufactured Home Restricted Account is established in the State Treasury as a restricted account, into which shall be deposited all annual community registration fees collected by the department, appropriations by the General Assembly to the office and board and filing fees collected in accordance with this subchapter.(b) Operations.--The money in the Manufactured Home Restricted Account is appropriated on a continuing basis for the operations of the office and board.§ 8351. Construction of subchapter.Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to contradict or interfere with the rights established under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.Section 2. The forms for disclosures and notices specified in 68 Pa.C.S. §§ 8313(c), 8316(d) and 8324(b) shall apply to actions that occur on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:20250HB2098PN2697 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subchs. A and B.(2) The act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act, is repealed.Section 4. The addition of 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subchs. A and B is a continuation of the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act. The following apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subchs. A and B, all activities initiated under the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subchs. A and B. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act and which are in effect on the effective date of section 3 of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subchs. A and B. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act.(2) Except as specified in paragraph (3), any difference in language between 68 Pa.C.S. Ch. 83 Subchs. A and B and the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act is intended only to conform to the style of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes and is not intended to change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administration and implementation of the Manufactured Home Community Rights 20250HB2098PN2697 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Act.(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply to the addition of the definition of "manufactured home" in 68 Pa.C.S. § 8302.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2098PN2697 - 50 - 1234